Nebraska, session 109, LB943.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB943 LB943
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Associated amenities includes any racetrack, garage, pit,
spectator seating, concession facility, restroom facility, administrative
office, maintenance facility, parking area, and driveway;
(b) Motor vehicle means any vehicle that is propelled by any power
other than muscular power;
(c) Motor vehicle racing facility means a facility and associated
amenities where one or more motor vehicles are used in any land-based
racing competition or in practice for any land-based racing competition;
and
(d) Racetrack includes any track that is paved or unpaved and any
oval track, road course, and drag strip.
(2) A motor vehicle racing facility shall not be found to be a
public or private nuisance if:
(a) The facility existed before a change in the land use or
occupancy of land in and about the locality of such facility; and
(b) Before such change, the facility would not have been a nuisance.
(3) A civil action against a motor vehicle racing facility for
public or private nuisance shall not be brought more than two years after
the condition that is the subject matter of the action reaches a level of
offense sufficient to sustain a claim of nuisance.
(4) This section shall not apply to any action brought to determine
compliance with or to enforce a previous order of a court related to the
same claim of nuisance or to any claims for additional damages or
equitable relief available when a motor vehicle racing facility fails to
remediate a nuisance pursuant to such court order.
-2-